Tennessee statutes. Title 22 Juries And Jurors
Part 3

Jury Selection and Attendance

22-2-301. Automated selection of names for jury list.

The jury coordinator in each county shall select names of prospective jurors to serve in the courts of that county by random automated means, without opportunity for the intervention of any human agency to select a particular name and in a manner that causes no prejudice to any person. The names, which shall constitute the jury list, shall be compiled from licensed driver records or lists, tax records or other available and reliable sources that are so tabulated and arranged that names can be selected by automated means. The jury coordinator may utilize a single source or any combination of sources. The jury coordinator is prohibited from using the permanent voter registration records as a source to compile the jury list.

The jury coordinator shall repeat this procedure as often as reasonably necessary, but in no event may a list be retained for more than two (2) years. Prior to repeating this procedure and compiling a new jury list, no person may add to or take from the existing list, except as provided in this part.

Notwithstanding the provisions of title 2, chapter 2, part 1 to the contrary, any voter registration form created on or after January 1, 2009, by the state coordinator of elections shall clearly state on the registration form the following: “Names of persons selected for jury service in state court are not chosen from permanent voter registration records.”

Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

The version of this chapter 2 that is applicable in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, was transferred to chapter 5 of this title by the code commission in 2008.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 2, §§ 22-2-101 — 22-2-315 (Acts 1959, ch. 8, §§ 1-16, 18, 19, 21; 1961, ch. 124, § 1; 1961, ch. 206, § 1; 1967, ch. 182, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 498, § 1; 1972, ch. 826, § 1; 1974, ch. 548, § 1; 1975, ch. 254, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 714, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 903, §§ 1-8, 10, 11; 1981, ch. 317, § 1; T.C.A., § 22-223 — 22-236, 22-238 — 22-242, 22-244; Acts 1981, ch. 82, §§ 1-3; 1983, ch. 108, §§ 1-3; 1984, ch. 649, § 1; 1984, ch. 650, § 1; 1984, ch. 716, § 1; 1985, ch. 343, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 736, § 1; 1989, ch. 449, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1993, ch. 291, § 1; 1993, ch. 309, § 1; 1994, ch. 642, § 1; 2000, ch. 733, § 1; 2005, ch. 254, § 1; 2005, ch. 429, § 3), concerning selection and attendance of jurors, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1, effective January 1, 2009, except in certain counties. See this version of chapter 2 for provisions effective January 1, 2009, except in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. See chapter 5 of this title for provisions effective in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 2011, ch. 209, § 1 deleted § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2), effective July 1, 2011. Since § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2) have been deleted, this chapter is no longer only effective in certain counties, and jurors and jury panels for the counties formerly referenced in § 22-2-101(b)(1) shall no longer be selected in accordance with this chapter as it existed prior to January 1, 2009, which was formerly compiled in title 22, ch. 5, which has been deleted.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 3-6-6.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Jury, § 15.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of jury coordinator to select prospective jurors to serve on jury panels. OAG 10-125, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 131 (12/30/10).

Cited: State v. Blair, — S.W.3d —, 2009 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 1032 (Tenn. Crim. App. Dec. 17, 2009); State v. Hester, 324 S.W.3d 1, 2010 Tenn. LEXIS 897 (Tenn. Oct. 5, 2010).

22-2-302. Alternate non-automated jury selection method.

In the event that any county of this state cannot obtain and select names for jury selection by automated means pursuant to § 22-2-301, the county may utilize the alternate jury selection method set out in this section.

The jury box, a suitable and well-bound book in which to record the jury list and any necessary stationery shall be purchased by the jury coordinator and paid for by the county, and the jury coordinator shall be the custodian of these items. Neither the book nor the box shall be opened except as provided in this part.

The jury coordinator and the circuit court clerk, or the clerk's deputy if the circuit court clerk serves as the jury coordinator, referred to as “witness” in this part, shall meet in the circuit court clerk's office at a time fixed by the presiding judge of the judicial district to select the names of prospective jurors to serve in the courts of the county. The names, which shall constitute the jury list, shall be selected randomly from licensed driver records or lists, tax records, or other available and reliable sources. The jury coordinator may utilize a single source or any combination of sources. The jury coordinator is prohibited from using the permanent voter registration records as a source to compile the jury list.

The number of names to be placed on the jury list shall be determined by the presiding judge of the judicial district.

The jury coordinator and the circuit court clerk, or the clerk's deputy if the circuit court clerk serves as the jury coordinator, shall repeat this procedure as often as reasonably necessary, but in no event may a list be retained for more than two (2) years. Prior to repeating this procedure and compiling a new jury list, no person may add to or take from the existing list, except as provided in this part.

At the top of each page of the well-bound book shall be written or printed the words, “Jury list for County.” Following these words and preceding the list of names shall be written these words, “Jury List Selected by , Jury Coordinator for County, on the day of , .”

Immediately following this heading shall be recorded the list of jurors selected, placing one (1) name on each line, arranging the names in alphabetical order and numbering them consecutively, beginning with No. 1.

At the end of the list shall be written and signed by the jury coordinator and the witness the following: “I, , Jury Coordinator for County, and , (witness) certify that the foregoing is the jury list selected by us for the next year(s)/month(s)/days for the county. This the day of , .”

The names on the list, preceded by the original number thereof, shall be written by the jury coordinator on tickets or cards of paper uniform in size, and placed in the jury box in the presence of the witness, the box to be kept securely locked and under seal, and it shall not be unlocked or the seal broken except by the order of and in the presence of the jury coordinator and a witness, and then only for the purpose of refilling the box or drawing from the box the names of jurors for jury service, or by order of a judge holding court as provided in this part.

The jury book shall be kept in secret by the jury coordinator under lock and key and no one shall be allowed to inspect the jury book except the presiding judge of the judicial district or the jury coordinator.

Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

The version of this chapter 2 that is applicable in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, was transferred to chapter 5 of this title by the code commission in 2008.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 2, §§ 22-2-101 — 22-2-315 (Acts 1959, ch. 8, §§ 1-16, 18, 19, 21; 1961, ch. 124, § 1; 1961, ch. 206, § 1; 1967, ch. 182, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 498, § 1; 1972, ch. 826, § 1; 1974, ch. 548, § 1; 1975, ch. 254, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 714, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 903, §§ 1-8, 10, 11; 1981, ch. 317, § 1; T.C.A., § 22-223 — 22-236, 22-238 — 22-242, 22-244; Acts 1981, ch. 82, §§ 1-3; 1983, ch. 108, §§ 1-3; 1984, ch. 649, § 1; 1984, ch. 650, § 1; 1984, ch. 716, § 1; 1985, ch. 343, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 736, § 1; 1989, ch. 449, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1993, ch. 291, § 1; 1993, ch. 309, § 1; 1994, ch. 642, § 1; 2000, ch. 733, § 1; 2005, ch. 254, § 1; 2005, ch. 429, § 3), concerning selection and attendance of jurors, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1, effective January 1, 2009, except in certain counties. See this version of chapter 2 for provisions effective January 1, 2009, except in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. See chapter 5 of this title for provisions effective in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 2011, ch. 209, § 1 deleted § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2), effective July 1, 2011. Since § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2) have been deleted, this chapter is no longer only effective in certain counties, and jurors and jury panels for the counties formerly referenced in § 22-2-101(b)(1) shall no longer be selected in accordance with this chapter as it existed prior to January 1, 2009, which was formerly compiled in title 22, ch. 5, which has been deleted.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), §§ 9.13, 25.20.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 3-6-6.

Law Reviews.

Criminal Law in Tennessee in 1980 — A Critical Survey, IV. Procedure (Joseph G. Cook), 48 Tenn. L. Rev. 563.

Cross-Sectionalism in Jury-Selection Procedures After Taylor v. Louisiana (Martha Craig Daughtrey), 43 Tenn. L. Rev. 1.

Jury Reform in Tennessee, 34 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1 (2003).

Special Project: Criminal Procedure as Defined by the Tennessee Supreme Court (Julian L. Bibb and Walter Sillers Weems), 30 Vand. L. Rev. (4) 691.

The Tennessee Court Systems — The Jury System, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 489.

Cited: State v. Hester, — S.W.3d —, 2009 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 363 (Tenn. Crim. App. Feb. 5, 2009); State v. Hester, 324 S.W.3d 1, 2010 Tenn. LEXIS 897 (Tenn. Oct. 5, 2010).

22-2-303. Counties having courts in two places — Separate records.

In those counties of the state where the circuit or criminal courts, or both, sit in two (2) places, the jury coordinators for those counties shall be required to select jurors from the territorial jurisdiction of each of the two (2) courts and will maintain two (2) sets of records, one (1) for each of the courts as is provided in this part, the same as if both courts were in separate counties.

Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

The version of this chapter 2 that is applicable in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, was transferred to chapter 5 of this title by the code commission in 2008.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 2, §§ 22-2-101 — 22-2-315 (Acts 1959, ch. 8, §§ 1-16, 18, 19, 21; 1961, ch. 124, § 1; 1961, ch. 206, § 1; 1967, ch. 182, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 498, § 1; 1972, ch. 826, § 1; 1974, ch. 548, § 1; 1975, ch. 254, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 714, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 903, §§ 1-8, 10, 11; 1981, ch. 317, § 1; T.C.A., § 22-223 — 22-236, 22-238 — 22-242, 22-244; Acts 1981, ch. 82, §§ 1-3; 1983, ch. 108, §§ 1-3; 1984, ch. 649, § 1; 1984, ch. 650, § 1; 1984, ch. 716, § 1; 1985, ch. 343, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 736, § 1; 1989, ch. 449, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1993, ch. 291, § 1; 1993, ch. 309, § 1; 1994, ch. 642, § 1; 2000, ch. 733, § 1; 2005, ch. 254, § 1; 2005, ch. 429, § 3), concerning selection and attendance of jurors, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1, effective January 1, 2009, except in certain counties. See this version of chapter 2 for provisions effective January 1, 2009, except in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. See chapter 5 of this title for provisions effective in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 2011, ch. 209, § 1 deleted § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2), effective July 1, 2011. Since § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2) have been deleted, this chapter is no longer only effective in certain counties, and jurors and jury panels for the counties formerly referenced in § 22-2-101(b)(1) shall no longer be selected in accordance with this chapter as it existed prior to January 1, 2009, which was formerly compiled in title 22, ch. 5, which has been deleted.

Collateral References. Jury
63.

22-2-304. Automated selection of names for jury pool.

In any county in this state where the names of prospective jurors are obtained by automated means pursuant to § 22-2-301, the selection of names of prospective jurors to be summoned shall likewise be made by automated means in such a manner as to assure proportionate distribution of names selected without opportunity for the intervention of any human agency to select a particular name and in a manner that causes no prejudice to any person. It is the duty of the presiding judge of the judicial district to notify the jury coordinator of the number of names to be selected from the jury list, and these names shall constitute the jury pool.

When the required number of names have been selected for the jury pool, the jury coordinator shall place a list of those names in an envelope, and with the list shall be enclosed a report prepared and signed by the jury coordinator. A copy of the list and report shall be retained by the jury coordinator for use under the provisions of this chapter, and the report shall provide substantially as follows:

To the Honorable , Presiding Judge of the Judicial District, at County:

I, , the jury coordinator for such county, report that the enclosed names, which have been drawn according to law, constitute the jury pool for the upcoming jury service term:

This the day of , .

Jury Coordinator

Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

The version of this chapter 2 that is applicable in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, was transferred to chapter 5 of this title by the code commission in 2008.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 2, §§ 22-2-101 — 22-2-315 (Acts 1959, ch. 8, §§ 1-16, 18, 19, 21; 1961, ch. 124, § 1; 1961, ch. 206, § 1; 1967, ch. 182, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 498, § 1; 1972, ch. 826, § 1; 1974, ch. 548, § 1; 1975, ch. 254, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 714, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 903, §§ 1-8, 10, 11; 1981, ch. 317, § 1; T.C.A., § 22-223 — 22-236, 22-238 — 22-242, 22-244; Acts 1981, ch. 82, §§ 1-3; 1983, ch. 108, §§ 1-3; 1984, ch. 649, § 1; 1984, ch. 650, § 1; 1984, ch. 716, § 1; 1985, ch. 343, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 736, § 1; 1989, ch. 449, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1993, ch. 291, § 1; 1993, ch. 309, § 1; 1994, ch. 642, § 1; 2000, ch. 733, § 1; 2005, ch. 254, § 1; 2005, ch. 429, § 3), concerning selection and attendance of jurors, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1, effective January 1, 2009, except in certain counties. See this version of chapter 2 for provisions effective January 1, 2009, except in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. See chapter 5 of this title for provisions effective in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 2011, ch. 209, § 1 deleted § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2), effective July 1, 2011. Since § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2) have been deleted, this chapter is no longer only effective in certain counties, and jurors and jury panels for the counties formerly referenced in § 22-2-101(b)(1) shall no longer be selected in accordance with this chapter as it existed prior to January 1, 2009, which was formerly compiled in title 22, ch. 5, which has been deleted.

Cross-References. Dentists exempt from jury service, § 63-5-123.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 25.20.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 3-6-6.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 14 Tenn. Juris., Grand Jury, § 6; 17 Tenn. Juris., Jury, § 15.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Criminal Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 319.

The Tennessee Court Systems — The Jury System, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 489.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of jury coordinator to select prospective jurors to serve on jury panels. OAG 10-125, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 131 (12/30/10).

Cited: State v. Hester, — S.W.3d —, 2009 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 363 (Tenn. Crim. App. Feb. 5, 2009).

22-2-305. Selection of names for jury pool by alternate manual means.

In the event that any county of this state cannot obtain and select names for the jury pool by automated means pursuant to § 22-2-304, the county may utilize the alternate jury selection method set out in this section.

On Monday, two (2) weeks before each jury service term, the jury coordinator shall unlock the jury box and break the seal of the jury box, and after well shaking the jury box, cause to be drawn from the jury box, in the presence of the witness, that number of names that the presiding judge of the judicial district has directed to be drawn, to constitute the jury pool for the jury service term. If the Monday two (2) weeks before the jury service term begins is a legal holiday, the jury coordinator may perform this function on the following business day.

In the event the name is drawn of a person known by the jury coordinator to no longer be qualified or competent to serve pursuant to § 22-1-101 or § 22-1-102, the name shall be put aside and not used, and another name shall be drawn instead. Should the jury coordinator, when drawing names from the jury box, overlook the names of persons who are incompetent or unqualified to serve, the presiding judge of the judicial district and the judge presiding over a trial in which those persons serve as jury panel members each shall have the authority to excuse those persons from jury service and direct that their names be withdrawn from the jury pool.

Not more than five (5) days before the jury service term and not later than the first day of the jury service term, the jury coordinator and witness shall certify that the names drawn constitute the jury pool for the term by following the procedures in subdivision (3)(B).

When the required number of names have been drawn for the jury pool, the original tickets or cards on which they have been written shall be placed in an envelope and with the the original tickets or cards shall be enclosed a report prepared and signed by the jury coordinator and witness, a copy of which shall be retained by the jury coordinator for use under the provisions of this chapter, substantially as follows:

To the Honorable , Presiding Judge of the Judicial District, at County:

I, , the jury coordinator for such county, and , who witnessed the selection of names, respectfully report the following names, which have been drawn according to law, arranged alphabetically and numbered, as shown on the original tickets or cards enclosed with this report, as the jury pool for the upcoming jury service term:

Names

No.

No.

No.

We further report that in addition to the above list there were drawn from the jury box at the same time the following names of persons known to the jury coordinator to be unqualified or incompetent to serve (copying such names and numbers), and we enclose such original tickets or cards with this report separate from the other tickets or cards.

This the day of , .

Jury Coordinator

Witness

The jury coordinator shall then seal the envelope containing the coordinator's report and the original tickets or cards, address the envelope to the presiding judge of the judicial district, write the judge's name across the sealing of the envelope, and deliver the envelope to the judge at the opening of the jury service term.

Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

The version of this chapter 2 that is applicable in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, was transferred to chapter 5 of this title by the code commission in 2008.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 2, §§ 22-2-101 — 22-2-315 (Acts 1959, ch. 8, §§ 1-16, 18, 19, 21; 1961, ch. 124, § 1; 1961, ch. 206, § 1; 1967, ch. 182, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 498, § 1; 1972, ch. 826, § 1; 1974, ch. 548, § 1; 1975, ch. 254, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 714, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 903, §§ 1-8, 10, 11; 1981, ch. 317, § 1; T.C.A., § 22-223 — 22-236, 22-238 — 22-242, 22-244; Acts 1981, ch. 82, §§ 1-3; 1983, ch. 108, §§ 1-3; 1984, ch. 649, § 1; 1984, ch. 650, § 1; 1984, ch. 716, § 1; 1985, ch. 343, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 736, § 1; 1989, ch. 449, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1993, ch. 291, § 1; 1993, ch. 309, § 1; 1994, ch. 642, § 1; 2000, ch. 733, § 1; 2005, ch. 254, § 1; 2005, ch. 429, § 3), concerning selection and attendance of jurors, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1, effective January 1, 2009, except in certain counties. See this version of chapter 2 for provisions effective January 1, 2009, except in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. See chapter 5 of this title for provisions effective in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 2011, ch. 209, § 1 deleted § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2), effective July 1, 2011. Since § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2) have been deleted, this chapter is no longer only effective in certain counties, and jurors and jury panels for the counties formerly referenced in § 22-2-101(b)(1) shall no longer be selected in accordance with this chapter as it existed prior to January 1, 2009, which was formerly compiled in title 22, ch. 5, which has been deleted.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), §§ 25.20, 24.32.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 3-6-6.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Jury, § 18.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court Systems — The Jury System, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 489.

Cited: State v. Hester, 324 S.W.3d 1, 2010 Tenn. LEXIS 897 (Tenn. Oct. 5, 2010).

Collateral References.

Indoctrination by court of persons summoned for jury service. 89 A.L.R.2d 197.

Jury
67.

22-2-306. Juror Summons — Contents.

Each juror summons shall include the following:

Name of the juror;

Address of the juror;

Date, time and place juror is required to appear in response to the summons or, in the alternative, date and method by which the juror is required to contact the jury coordinator or otherwise respond to the court regarding the juror's service;

Penalty for juror's failure to appear or otherwise respond to the summons in the prescribed manner;

Juror qualifications listed in §§ 22-1-101 and 22-1-102;

Process by which the juror may attempt to be excused due to a hardship pursuant to § 22-1-103, including the juror's obligation to submit documentation in support of the juror's request; and

Process by which the juror may request a postponement of jury service pursuant to § 22-2-315.

The administrative office of the courts shall prepare a form juror summons that may be used by the jury coordinator in any county.

Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

The version of this chapter 2 that is applicable in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, was transferred to chapter 5 of this title by the code commission in 2008.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 2, §§ 22-2-101 — 22-2-315 (Acts 1959, ch. 8, §§ 1-16, 18, 19, 21; 1961, ch. 124, § 1; 1961, ch. 206, § 1; 1967, ch. 182, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 498, § 1; 1972, ch. 826, § 1; 1974, ch. 548, § 1; 1975, ch. 254, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 714, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 903, §§ 1-8, 10, 11; 1981, ch. 317, § 1; T.C.A., § 22-223 — 22-236, 22-238 — 22-242, 22-244; Acts 1981, ch. 82, §§ 1-3; 1983, ch. 108, §§ 1-3; 1984, ch. 649, § 1; 1984, ch. 650, § 1; 1984, ch. 716, § 1; 1985, ch. 343, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 736, § 1; 1989, ch. 449, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1993, ch. 291, § 1; 1993, ch. 309, § 1; 1994, ch. 642, § 1; 2000, ch. 733, § 1; 2005, ch. 254, § 1; 2005, ch. 429, § 3), concerning selection and attendance of jurors, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1, effective January 1, 2009, except in certain counties. See this version of chapter 2 for provisions effective January 1, 2009, except in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. See chapter 5 of this title for provisions effective in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 2011, ch. 209, § 1 deleted § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2), effective July 1, 2011. Since § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2) have been deleted, this chapter is no longer only effective in certain counties, and jurors and jury panels for the counties formerly referenced in § 22-2-101(b)(1) shall no longer be selected in accordance with this chapter as it existed prior to January 1, 2009, which was formerly compiled in title 22, ch. 5, which has been deleted.

Attorney General Opinions. Qualifying jurors and assigning jury-service dates online, OAG 14-64, 2014 Tenn. AG Lexis 67 (6/25/14)

Cited: State v. Flamini, — S.W.3d —, 2009 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 380 (Tenn. Crim. App. May 26, 2009).

22-2-307. Summoning jurors.

The sheriff shall summon jurors by first class mail sent to the regular address of each member of the jury pool, giving notice of such person's selection for jury duty. The summons shall be mailed to the regular address at least ten (10) days prior to the date fixed for such person's appearance for jury service.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), the sheriff may summon jurors by personal service.

The jury coordinator shall provide sufficient information regarding the members of the jury pool to enable the sheriff to summon the jurors pursuant to this section.

Notwithstanding subsections (a)-(c), the jury coordinator may, at the coordinator's discretion, summon the jurors by first class mail without the assistance of the sheriff.

Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

The version of this chapter 2 that is applicable in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, was transferred to chapter 5 of this title by the code commission in 2008.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 2, §§ 22-2-101 — 22-2-315 (Acts 1959, ch. 8, §§ 1-16, 18, 19, 21; 1961, ch. 124, § 1; 1961, ch. 206, § 1; 1967, ch. 182, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 498, § 1; 1972, ch. 826, § 1; 1974, ch. 548, § 1; 1975, ch. 254, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 714, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 903, §§ 1-8, 10, 11; 1981, ch. 317, § 1; T.C.A., § 22-223 — 22-236, 22-238 — 22-242, 22-244; Acts 1981, ch. 82, §§ 1-3; 1983, ch. 108, §§ 1-3; 1984, ch. 649, § 1; 1984, ch. 650, § 1; 1984, ch. 716, § 1; 1985, ch. 343, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 736, § 1; 1989, ch. 449, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1993, ch. 291, § 1; 1993, ch. 309, § 1; 1994, ch. 642, § 1; 2000, ch. 733, § 1; 2005, ch. 254, § 1; 2005, ch. 429, § 3), concerning selection and attendance of jurors, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1, effective January 1, 2009, except in certain counties. See this version of chapter 2 for provisions effective January 1, 2009, except in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. See chapter 5 of this title for provisions effective in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 2011, ch. 209, § 1 deleted § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2), effective July 1, 2011. Since § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2) have been deleted, this chapter is no longer only effective in certain counties, and jurors and jury panels for the counties formerly referenced in § 22-2-101(b)(1) shall no longer be selected in accordance with this chapter as it existed prior to January 1, 2009, which was formerly compiled in title 22, ch. 5, which has been deleted.

22-2-308. Publication of jury list — Copies.

Immediately after the jury pool has been summoned in accordance with § 22-2-307, the jury coordinator shall create a list of the members of the jury pool, and a copy of the list of the members of the jury pool shall be posted in the clerk's office for public inspection. In addition, the jury coordinator shall cause to be made a sufficient number of copies of the list of the members of the jury pool, which shall be placed in the clerk's office and available for general distribution to the members of the bar and to all other interested persons.

Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

The version of this chapter 2 that is applicable in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, was transferred to chapter 5 of this title by the code commission in 2008.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 2, §§ 22-2-101 — 22-2-315 (Acts 1959, ch. 8, §§ 1-16, 18, 19, 21; 1961, ch. 124, § 1; 1961, ch. 206, § 1; 1967, ch. 182, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 498, § 1; 1972, ch. 826, § 1; 1974, ch. 548, § 1; 1975, ch. 254, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 714, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 903, §§ 1-8, 10, 11; 1981, ch. 317, § 1; T.C.A., § 22-223 — 22-236, 22-238 — 22-242, 22-244; Acts 1981, ch. 82, §§ 1-3; 1983, ch. 108, §§ 1-3; 1984, ch. 649, § 1; 1984, ch. 650, § 1; 1984, ch. 716, § 1; 1985, ch. 343, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 736, § 1; 1989, ch. 449, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1993, ch. 291, § 1; 1993, ch. 309, § 1; 1994, ch. 642, § 1; 2000, ch. 733, § 1; 2005, ch. 254, § 1; 2005, ch. 429, § 3), concerning selection and attendance of jurors, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1, effective January 1, 2009, except in certain counties. See this version of chapter 2 for provisions effective January 1, 2009, except in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. See chapter 5 of this title for provisions effective in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 2011, ch. 209, § 1 deleted § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2), effective July 1, 2011. Since § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2) have been deleted, this chapter is no longer only effective in certain counties, and jurors and jury panels for the counties formerly referenced in § 22-2-101(b)(1) shall no longer be selected in accordance with this chapter as it existed prior to January 1, 2009, which was formerly compiled in title 22, ch. 5, which has been deleted.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 25.22.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 3-6-6.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Jury, § 16.

Cited: State v. Flamini, — S.W.3d —, 2009 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 380 (Tenn. Crim. App. May 26, 2009); Young v. State, — S.W.3d —, 2011 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 638 (Tenn. Crim. App. Aug. 18, 2011); State v. Marsh, — S.W.3d —, 2012 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 728 (Tenn. Crim. App. Sept. 17, 2012).

22-2-309. Attendance of jurors — Excuse upon showing of sufficient cause.

All persons summoned as members of the jury pool shall attend at the time and place designated in the summons, or otherwise respond as specified in the summons, unless excused pursuant to § 22-1-103, granted a postponement pursuant to § 22-2-315, or otherwise discharged in a manner authorized by this title or other binding legal authority.

If a person who has been summoned but not excused or discharged pursuant to subsection (a) fails to appear for service or otherwise respond as directed, a show cause order shall issue and be served upon the person, requiring the person to appear at a date certain and show cause why the person should not be held in civil contempt of court for the person's failure to appear.

Upon the appearance of any person served with a show cause order, the person may make the person's excuse known. If the person was summoned and if the excuse is sufficient in the opinion of a judge of the court for which the individual was called to jury service, the person shall be excused; but the person shall pay the cost incident to issuance and service of the show cause order, unless waived by the judge. If the excuse is insufficient, the person shall be adjudged in civil contempt of court and shall be assessed a civil penalty of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) and the costs of the show cause order. The court shall suspend payment of that portion of the civil penalty in excess of fifty dollars ($50.00) upon the condition that the person complete the jury service term for which the person was summoned. The civil penalty authorized by this subsection (c) is remedial in nature.

Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

The version of this chapter 2 that is applicable in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, was transferred to chapter 5 of this title by the code commission in 2008.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 2, §§ 22-2-101 — 22-2-315 (Acts 1959, ch. 8, §§ 1-16, 18, 19, 21; 1961, ch. 124, § 1; 1961, ch. 206, § 1; 1967, ch. 182, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 498, § 1; 1972, ch. 826, § 1; 1974, ch. 548, § 1; 1975, ch. 254, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 714, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 903, §§ 1-8, 10, 11; 1981, ch. 317, § 1; T.C.A., § 22-223 — 22-236, 22-238 — 22-242, 22-244; Acts 1981, ch. 82, §§ 1-3; 1983, ch. 108, §§ 1-3; 1984, ch. 649, § 1; 1984, ch. 650, § 1; 1984, ch. 716, § 1; 1985, ch. 343, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 736, § 1; 1989, ch. 449, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1993, ch. 291, § 1; 1993, ch. 309, § 1; 1994, ch. 642, § 1; 2000, ch. 733, § 1; 2005, ch. 254, § 1; 2005, ch. 429, § 3), concerning selection and attendance of jurors, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1, effective January 1, 2009, except in certain counties. See this version of chapter 2 for provisions effective January 1, 2009, except in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. See chapter 5 of this title for provisions effective in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 2011, ch. 209, § 1 deleted § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2), effective July 1, 2011. Since § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2) have been deleted, this chapter is no longer only effective in certain counties, and jurors and jury panels for the counties formerly referenced in § 22-2-101(b)(1) shall no longer be selected in accordance with this chapter as it existed prior to January 1, 2009, which was formerly compiled in title 22, ch. 5, which has been deleted.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 3-6-6.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Jury, § 18.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court Systems — The Jury System, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 489.

What Jurors Want to Know: Motivating Juror Cognition to Increase Legal Knowledge & Improve Decisionmaking, 81 Tenn. L. Rev. 752 (2014).

Attorney General Opinions. Qualifying jurors and assigning jury-service dates online. OAG 14-64, 2014 Tenn. AG Lexis 67 (6/25/14).

Collateral References. Jury
57-82.